District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Paper Alleys Planning Amendment Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. The text under the heading “ASSESSMENT AND PERMIT WORK” of An Act
Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia
for fiscal year ending June thirtieth, eighteen hundred and ninety-five, and for other purposes,
approved August 7, 1894 (28 Stat. 247; D.C. Official Code § 9-401.06), is amended by adding
new subsections (d) and (e) to read as follows:
“(d) No later than March 15, 2026, the Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) shall
develop a plan for improving all paper alleys, which shall include the following:
“(1) A publicly posted map identifying the locations and ownership of all known
paper alleys in the District;


“(2) Plans for identifying, inspecting, and developing a cost estimate for repairing
each paper alley such that it is built to DDOT standards;
“(3) Plans and metrics for engaging neighbors adjacent to a paper alley and the
alley’s Advisory Neighborhood Commission to solicit community input on alleyway
improvements and understand what changes to the alley the community would support;
“(4) A cost estimate for:
“(A) Fully repairing all of the District’s paper alleys; and
“(B) Repairing paper alleys only when there is sufficient community
support, as determined by metrics established by DDOT, for improvements or changes to an
alley’s structure; and
“(5) A framework for evaluating which paper alleys to improve first, which shall
prioritize low-income communities and high-usage alleys.”
“(e) For purposes of this section, the term “paper alley” shall mean an unpaved or
partially paved alley.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December


24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.